California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish transparency for renters and home buyers regarding the existence of a decarbonization charge associated with a decarbonization upgrade located on a property.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the act of an energy supplier, including, but not limited to, a gas corporation, recording a notice of decarbonization charge pursuant to this chapter does not constitute a debt collection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 276, Sec. 1.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8376.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Decarbonization charge” means a charge that is added to the billing for service associated with the electrical meter, or other measuring device, under the control of an energy supplier located at the subscriber property where a decarbonization upgrade is located, and that is collected in order to pay for a decarbonization upgrade.

(2) If an energy supplier is a gas corporation, as defined in Section
 222, “decarbonization charge” shall be limited to a charge for measures that provide a measurable reduction in natural gas consumption and associated greenhouse gas emissions.

(b) “Decarbonization upgrade” means all of the following:

(1) A change to a subscriber property that reduces the demand for energy from an energy supplier.

(2) A change to a subscriber property that allows for storage of energy.

(3) A change to a subscriber property that reduces the use of fossil
 fuels.

(4) A change to a subscriber property that converts water, wind, or sunlight to usable electricity.

(c) “Energy supplier” means any of the following:

(1) An entity that offers an electricity product for sale to retail consumers in California, including an electrical corporation, local publicly owned electric utility, electric service provider, and community choice aggregator.

(2) Any private corporation or association organized for purposes of transmitting or distributing electricity exclusively to its stockholders or members at cost, including an electrical cooperative.

(3) A gas
 corporation, as defined in Section 222.

(d) “Subscriber” means a person or entity that purchases energy or energy services from an energy supplier and is billed for the energy or energy services by the energy supplier, either directly or by another entity on behalf of the energy supplier.

(e) “Subscriber property” means residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real
 property owned, leased, or licensed for occupancy by the subscriber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8377.

(a) This chapter shall apply to any program or initiative administered by an energy supplier that has all of the following attributes:

(1) The program or initiative makes a site-specific investment to fund the installation of decarbonization upgrades on subscriber properties.

(2) The program or initiative recovers any portion of the site-specific investment through decarbonization charges associated with one or more electrical meters, or other measuring devices, associated with those upgraded subscriber
 properties.

(3) The program or initiative imposes a duty to pay the decarbonization charge that arises from, and is evidenced by, a written agreement executed relative to the installation of the decarbonization upgrade on the subscriber property between the property owner, or all current property owners of record, if different than the subscriber, and the energy supplier.

(4) Under the program or initiative, the subscriber’s obligation to pay the decarbonization charge is associated with the electrical meter, or other measuring device, located at the subscriber’s property on which the decarbonization upgrade is located and is transferable to any successor subscriber who subsequently
 receives
 energy service at the property.

(b) The commission, or the governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative, as applicable, shall require an energy supplier, in administering the program or initiative, to facilitate proper notification of upgrades and decarbonization charge obligations to successor subscribers by completing all of the following:

(1) The energy supplier shall record, no later than 30 days after funding a decarbonization upgrade, a notice of decarbonization charge with the county recorder of the county where the property subject to the decarbonization charge is located. A county recorder, upon recording a notice of decarbonization charge, shall index the notice of decarbonization charge in the general index by the name of the owner of the real property where the
 electrical meter, or other measuring device, affected by the decarbonization charge will be located. The notice shall be entitled “NOTICE OF DECARBONIZATION CHARGE” and shall comply with Section 27324 of the Government Code. The recordation of the notice of decarbonization charge shall be considered sufficient notice to a subsequent subscriber at a property with installed decarbonization upgrades of the subscriber’s obligation to pay the decarbonization charge for installed measures.

(2) The recorded notice of decarbonization charge shall contain all of the following information:

(A) The address or legal description, the assessor’s parcel number, and the name of the owner, of the real property where the electrical
 meter, or other measuring device, affected by the decarbonization charge will be located.

(B) The decarbonization charge amount and payment period.

(C) A description of the decarbonization upgrades funded with the decarbonization charge.

(D) Contact information for the person or entity authorized to provide a prompt and accurate written statement of the outstanding charges and payoff amounts related to the decarbonization charge for which the notice of decarbonization charge was recorded.

(3) Within 30 days of full cost recovery of the outstanding charges related to the recorded notice of decarbonization charge, the energy supplier shall record a notice of the full cost recovery and removal of the
 decarbonization charge with the county recorder of the county where the property subject to the decarbonization charge is located. The notice of the full cost recovery and removal of the decarbonization charge shall include a reference to the recorded notice of decarbonization charge.

(4) Within 30 days of a decision by the energy supplier to cease collection of the charge, the energy supplier shall record a notice of removal of the decarbonization charge with the county recorder of the county where the property subject to the decarbonization charge is located. The notice of the removal of the decarbonization charge shall include a reference to the recorded notice of the decarbonization charge.

(5) When the subscriber property is not owner-occupied, the written agreement between the energy supplier and the property owner executed relative to the installation of the decarbonization
 upgrade shall incorporate a requirement that the property owner shall cause the obligation to pay the decarbonization charge to appear in the terms through which the subscriber leases or licenses the property for occupancy. This paragraph shall only apply to written agreements executed after January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 276, Sec. 3.   (AB 737)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Privacy Protections for Energy Consumption Data [8380. - 8381.]

8380.

(a) For purposes of this section, “electrical or gas consumption data” means data about a customer’s electrical or natural gas usage that is made available as part of an advanced metering infrastructure, and includes incremental and monthly meter-specific electricity data, to the extent produced by that infrastructure, and the name, account number, and address of the customer.

(b) (1) An electrical corporation or gas corporation shall not share, disclose, or otherwise make accessible to any third party a customer’s electrical or gas consumption data, except as provided in subdivision (f) or upon the consent of the customer. Customer consent may be verified
 through an electronic signature authorization process pursuant to the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(2) An electrical corporation or gas corporation shall not sell a customer’s electrical or gas consumption data or any other personally identifiable information for any purpose.

(3) An electrical corporation or gas corporation or its contractors shall not provide an incentive or discount to the customer for accessing the customer’s electrical or gas consumption data without the prior consent of the customer.

(4) An electrical or gas corporation that utilizes an advanced metering infrastructure that allows a customer to access the customer’s electrical and gas consumption data shall ensure that the customer has an option to access that data without being required to agree to the sharing of the customer’s personally identifiable information, including electrical or gas consumption data, with a third party.

(c) If an electrical corporation or gas corporation contracts with a third party for a service that allows a customer to monitor the customer’s electricity or gas usage, and that third party uses the data for a secondary commercial purpose, the contract between the electrical corporation or gas corporation and the third party shall provide that the third party prominently discloses that secondary
 commercial purpose to the customer and secures the customer’s consent to the use of the customer’s data for that secondary commercial purpose prior to the use of the data.

(d) An electrical corporation or gas corporation shall use reasonable security procedures and practices to protect a customer’s unencrypted electrical or gas consumption data from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(e) An electrical corporation or gas corporation shall not share, disclose, or otherwise make accessible to any immigration authority, as defined in Section 7284.4 of the Government Code, a customer’s electrical or gas consumption data without a court-ordered subpoena or judicial warrant.

(f) (1) This section does not preclude an electrical corporation or gas corporation from using customer aggregate electrical or gas consumption data for analysis, reporting, or program management if all information has been removed regarding the individual identity of a customer.

(2) This section does not preclude an electrical corporation or gas corporation from disclosing a customer’s electrical or gas consumption data to a third party for system, grid, or operational needs, or the implementation of demand response, energy management, or energy efficiency programs, provided that, for contracts entered into after January 1, 2011, the utility has required by contract that the third party implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information to protect the personal information
 from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure, and prohibits the use of the data for a secondary commercial purpose not related to the primary purpose of the contract without the customer’s prior consent to that use.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (e), this section does not preclude an electrical corporation or gas corporation from disclosing electrical or gas consumption data as required or permitted under state or federal law or by an order of the commission.

(g) If a customer chooses to disclose the customer’s electrical or gas consumption data to a third party that is unaffiliated with, and has no other business relationship with, the electrical or gas corporation, the electrical or gas corporation is not responsible for the security of
 that data, or its use or misuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 188, Sec. 2.   (AB 2788)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8381.

(a) For purposes of this section, “electrical consumption data” means data about a customer’s electrical usage that is made available as part of an advanced metering infrastructure, and includes the name, account number, or residence of the customer.

(b) (1) A local publicly owned electric utility shall not share, disclose, or otherwise make accessible to any third party a customer’s electrical consumption data, except as provided in subdivision (f) or upon the consent of the customer.

(2) A local publicly owned electric utility shall not sell a customer’s electrical consumption data or any other personally identifiable
 information for any purpose.

(3) A local publicly owned electric utility or its contractors shall not provide an incentive or discount to the customer for accessing the customer’s electrical consumption data without the prior consent of the customer.

(4) A local publicly owned electric utility that utilizes an advanced metering infrastructure that allows a customer to access the customer’s electrical consumption data shall ensure that the customer has an option to access that data without being required to agree to the sharing of the customer’s personally identifiable information, including electrical
 consumption data, with a third party.

(c) If a local publicly owned electric utility contracts with a third party for a service that allows a customer to monitor the customer’s electricity usage, and that third party uses the data for a secondary commercial purpose, the contract between the local publicly owned electric utility and the third party shall provide that the third party prominently discloses that secondary commercial purpose to the customer and secures the customer’s consent to the use of the customer’s data for that secondary commercial purpose prior to the use of the data.

(d) A local publicly owned electric utility shall use reasonable security procedures and practices to protect a customer’s unencrypted electrical consumption data from unauthorized access, destruction,
 use, modification, or disclosure, and to prohibit the use of the data for a secondary commercial purpose not related to the primary purpose of the contract without the customer’s consent.

(e) A local publicly owned electric utility shall not share, disclose, or otherwise make accessible to any immigration authority, as defined in Section 7284.4 of the Government Code, a customer’s electrical consumption data without a court-ordered subpoena or judicial warrant.

(f) (1) This section shall not preclude a local publicly owned electric utility from using customer aggregate electrical consumption data for analysis, reporting, or program management if all information has been removed regarding the individual identity of a customer.

(2) This section shall not preclude a local publicly owned electric utility from disclosing a customer’s electrical consumption data to a third party for system, grid, or operational needs, or the implementation of demand response, energy management, or energy efficiency programs, provided, for contracts entered into after January 1, 2011, that the utility has required by contract that the third party implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information to protect the personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure, and prohibits the use of the data for a secondary commercial purpose not related to the primary purpose of the contract without the customer’s prior consent to that use.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (e), this section shall not preclude a local publicly owned electric utility from disclosing electrical consumption data as required under state or federal law.

(g) If a customer chooses to disclose the customer’s electrical consumption data to a third party that is unaffiliated with, and has no other business relationship with, the local publicly owned electric utility, the utility shall not be responsible for the security of that data, or its use or misuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 188, Sec. 3.   (AB 2788)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Wildfire Mitigation [8385. - 8389.]

8385.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Deenergization event” means the proactive interruption of electrical service for the purpose of mitigating or avoiding the risk of causing a wildfire.

(2) “Electrical cooperative” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2776.

(3) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 218.

(4) “Large electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3280.

(5) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section
 224.3.

(6) “Office” means the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety, within the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2021, the office shall supervise an electrical corporation’s compliance with the requirements of this chapter pursuant to the Public Utilities Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) of Division 1). This chapter does not affect the commission’s authority or jurisdiction over an electrical corporation, electrical cooperative, or local publicly owned electric utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 52.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.

(a) Each electrical corporation shall construct, maintain, and operate its electrical lines and equipment in a manner that will minimize the risk of catastrophic wildfire posed by those electrical lines and equipment, taking into account both the time required to implement the proposed mitigation and the amount of risk reduced for the cost and risk remaining.

(b) Each electrical corporation shall submit a wildfire mitigation plan to the office for review at least once every four years. The office shall establish a schedule for the submission of subsequent comprehensive wildfire mitigation plans, which may allow for the staggering of evaluation and performance periods for each electrical corporation.

(c) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, each electrical corporation shall submit a preliminary wildfire mitigation plan to the office at the earliest date of one year before the filing of its general rate case application or concurrent with the filing of its Risk Assessment Mitigation Phase application with the commission. The wildfire mitigation plan shall cover the same period as the general rate case period.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to independent transmission owners.

(d) The wildfire mitigation plan shall include all of the following:

(1) An accounting of the responsibilities of persons responsible for executing the plan.

(2) The objectives of the plan.

(3) A description of the preventive strategies and programs to be adopted by the electrical corporation to minimize the risk of its electrical lines and equipment causing catastrophic wildfires, including consideration of dynamic climate change risks.

(4) A
 description of the metrics the electrical corporation plans to use to measure and track the implementation of the plan and the assumptions that underlie the use of those metrics.

(5) A discussion of how the application of previously identified metrics to previous plan performances has informed the plan.

(6) A description of the electrical corporation’s protocols for disabling reclosers and deenergizing portions of the electrical distribution system that consider the associated impacts on public safety. As part of these protocols, each electrical corporation shall include protocols related to mitigating the public safety impacts of disabling reclosers and deenergizing portions of the electrical distribution system that consider the impacts on all of the following:

(A) Critical first responders.

(B) Health and communication infrastructure.

(C) Customers who receive medical baseline allowances pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 739. The electrical corporation may deploy backup electrical resources or provide financial assistance for backup electrical resources to a customer receiving a medical baseline allowance for a customer who meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The customer relies on life-support equipment that operates on electricity to sustain life.

(ii) The customer demonstrates financial need, including through enrollment in the California Alternate Rates for Energy program continued pursuant to Section 739.1.

(iii) The customer is not eligible for backup electrical resources provided through medical services, medical insurance, or community resources.

(D) Subparagraph (C) does not prevent an electrical corporation from deploying backup electrical resources or providing financial assistance for backup electrical resources under any other authority.

(7) A description of the electrical corporation’s appropriate and feasible procedures for notifying a customer who may be impacted by the deenergizing of electrical lines, including procedures for those customers receiving medical baseline allowances as described in paragraph (6). The procedures shall direct notification to all public safety offices, critical first responders, health care facilities, and operators of telecommunications infrastructure with premises within the footprint of potential deenergization for a given event. The procedures shall comply with any orders of the commission
 regarding notifications of deenergization events.

(8) Identification of circuits that have frequently been deenergized pursuant to a deenergization event to mitigate the risk of wildfire and the measures taken, or planned to be taken, by the electrical corporation to reduce the need for, and impact of, future deenergization of those circuits, including, but not limited to, the estimated annual decline in circuit deenergization and deenergization impact on customers, and replacing, hardening, or undergrounding any portion of the circuit or of upstream transmission or distribution lines.

(9) Plans for vegetation management.

(10) Plans for inspections of the electrical corporation’s electrical infrastructure.

(11) A description of the electrical
 corporation’s protocols for the deenergization of the electrical corporation’s transmission infrastructure, for instances when the deenergization may impact customers who, or entities that, are dependent upon the infrastructure. The protocols shall comply with any order of the commission regarding deenergization events.

(12) A list that identifies, describes, and prioritizes all wildfire risks, and drivers for those risks, throughout the electrical corporation’s service territory, including all relevant wildfire risk and risk mitigation information that is required by the commission’s risk-based decisionmaking framework established in commission Application 15-05-002 or Rulemaking 20-07-013, or subsequent safety model assessment proceedings, and the Risk Assessment Mitigation Phase filings. The list shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Risks and risk drivers associated with design, construction, operations, and maintenance of the electrical corporation’s equipment and facilities.

(B) Particular risks and risk drivers associated with topographic and climatological risk factors throughout the different parts of the electrical corporation’s service territory.

(C) Particular risks and risk drivers associated with the speed with which wildfire risk mitigation measures can and will be deployed by an electrical corporation within its service territory.

(D) An estimate of cost-per-avoided ignition for each risk, or an explanation on why such a value could not be assigned to a particular risk.

(13) A description of how the plan accounts for the wildfire risk identified in the electrical corporation’s Risk Assessment Mitigation Phase filing, if applicable.

(14) A description of the actions the electrical corporation will take to ensure its system will achieve the highest level of safety, reliability, and resiliency, taking into account the cost and time required to achieve those benefits, and to ensure that its system is prepared for a major event, including hardening and modernizing its infrastructure with improved engineering, system design, standards, equipment, and facilities, such as
 undergrounding, insulating of distribution wires, and replacing poles. The electrical corporation shall present the cost-efficiency measures adopted by the commission, calculated consistently with the direction provided by the commission’s most recent risk-based decisionmaking framework proceeding, for at least two reasonable mitigation alternatives for a given identified wildfire risk.

(15) A description of where and how the electrical corporation considered undergrounding electrical distribution lines within those areas of its service territory identified to have the highest wildfire risk in a commission fire threat map.

(16) A showing that the electrical corporation has an adequately sized and trained workforce to promptly restore service after a major event, taking into
 account employees of other utilities pursuant to mutual aid agreements and employees of entities that have entered into contracts with the electrical corporation.

(17) Identification of any geographic area in the electrical corporation’s service territory that is a higher wildfire threat than is currently identified in a commission fire threat map, and where the commission should consider expanding the high fire threat district based on new information or changes in the environment.

(18) A methodology for identifying and presenting enterprisewide safety risk and wildfire-related risk that is consistent with the methodology used by other electrical corporations unless the commission determines otherwise.

(19) A description of how the plan is consistent with the electrical corporation’s disaster and emergency
 preparedness plan prepared pursuant to Section 768.6, including both of the following:

(A) Plans to prepare for, and to restore service after, a wildfire, including workforce mobilization and prepositioning equipment and employees.

(B) Plans for community outreach and public awareness before, during, and after a wildfire, including language notification in English, Spanish, and the top three primary languages used in the state other than English or Spanish, as determined by the commission based on the United States Census data.

(20) A statement of how the electrical corporation will restore service after a wildfire.

(21) Protocols for compliance with requirements adopted by the commission regarding activities to support customers during and after a
 wildfire, outage reporting, support for low-income customers, billing adjustments, deposit waivers, extended payment plans, suspension of disconnection and nonpayment fees, repair processing and timing, access to electrical corporation representatives, and emergency communications.

(22) A description of the processes and procedures the electrical corporation will use to do all of the following:

(A) Monitor and audit the implementation of the plan.

(B) Identify any deficiencies in the plan or the plan’s implementation and correct those deficiencies.

(C) Monitor and audit the effectiveness of electrical line and equipment inspections, including inspections performed by contractors, carried out under the plan and other applicable statutes and commission
 rules.

(23) Any other information that the office may require.

(e) The office shall post all wildfire mitigation plans submitted pursuant to this section on the office’s internet website beginning July 1, 2021, for no less than two months before the office’s decision regarding approval of the plan. The office shall accept comments on each plan from the public, other local and state agencies, and interested parties, and verify that the plan complies with all applicable rules, regulations, and standards, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 53.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.1.

The commission may assess penalties on an electrical corporation that fails to comply with its plan. In determining an appropriate amount of the penalty, the commission shall consider all of the following:

(a) The nature and severity of any noncompliance, including whether the noncompliance resulted in harm.

(b) The extent to which the commission has found that the electrical corporation failed to comply with its plans in prior years.

(c) Whether the electrical corporation self-reported the circumstances constituting noncompliance.

(d) Whether the electrical corporation implemented corrective actions with respect to the noncompliance.

(e) Whether the electrical corporation knew or in the exercise of reasonable care should have known of the circumstances constituting noncompliance.

(f) Whether the electrical corporation had previously engaged in conduct of a similar nature that caused significant property damage or injury.

(g) Any other factors established by the commission in an order assessing penalties for noncompliance, consistent with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 54.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.2.

(a) The commission shall require a safety culture assessment of each electrical corporation to be conducted by an independent third-party evaluator. The commission shall set the schedule for each assessment, including updates to the assessment at least every five years. The electrical corporation shall not seek reimbursement for the costs of the assessment from ratepayers.

(b) The office shall conduct a wildfire-focused safety culture assessment of each electrical
 corporation at least once every two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 55.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.3.

(a) (1) (A) The office shall approve or deny each wildfire mitigation plan within nine months of its submission.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for an electrical corporation that is not an independent transmission owner, the wildfire mitigation plan is subject to approval pursuant to Section 8386.4.

(2) The office shall consult with the Office of the State Fire Marshal on the review of each wildfire mitigation plan and update. In rendering its decision, the office shall consider comments submitted pursuant to subdivision(e) of Section 8386. Before approval, the office may require modifications of the plan.

(3) The office may extend any deadlines established pursuant to this subdivision. The decision to extend deadlines shall be made in writing and include reasons supporting the determination that the deadline cannot be met.

(4) An approval of a plan pursuant to this section is not a project as defined in Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, provided that environmental review otherwise required by Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code occurs before any project approval that would authorize physical changes being made to the environment.

(b) Following approval of a wildfire mitigation plan pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section or Section 8386.4, the office shall oversee the implementation of the plan consistent with all of the following:

(1) On or before April 1, 2026, and on or before each April 1 thereafter, each electrical corporation shall file with the office a self-evaluation report addressing the electrical corporation’s implementation of its approved plan during the prior calendar year.

(2) (A) On or before March 1, 2021, and on or before each March 1 thereafter, the office, in consultation with the Office of the State Fire Marshal, shall make available a list of qualified independent evaluators with experience in assessing the safe operation of electrical infrastructure.

(B) (i) Each electrical corporation shall engage an independent evaluator listed pursuant to subparagraph (A) to review and assess the electrical corporation’s implementation of its approved plan. The engaged independent evaluator shall consult with, and operate under the direction of, the office. The independent evaluator shall issue a report on or before July 1 of each year in which a report required by paragraph (1) is filed.

(ii) The office shall consider the independent evaluator’s findings, but the independent evaluator’s findings are not binding on the office.

(3) The commission shall authorize the electrical corporation to recover in rates the costs of the independent evaluator.

(4) The office shall complete its performance review of an electrical corporation’s implementation of its plan within 18 months after the submission of the electrical corporation’s self-evaluation report.

(5) (A) Following the end of the performance period, the office may, consistent with its authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision(b) of Section 15475 of the Government Code, conduct audits of the vegetation management work performed by, or on behalf of, the electrical corporation. The initial audit shall identify deficiencies in the electrical corporation’s implementation of the vegetation management commitments in the wildfire mitigation plan. The office shall provide the initial audit report to the electrical corporation. The electrical corporation shall have a reasonable time, as determined by the office, to respond to and develop corrective actions for any deficiency specified in the initial audit report.

(B) The office may engage its own independent auditor who shall be a certified arborist and shall have any other qualifications determined appropriate by the office, to conduct the audit specified in subparagraph (A). The independent auditor shall consult with, and operate under the direction of, the office.

(C) Following the expiration of the time period for an electrical corporation to respond to and develop corrective actions for any deficiency identified in the initial audit, the office or the independent auditor shall issue an updated audit report to the electrical corporation identifying any outstanding deficiency in the electrical corporation’s implementation or planned corrective actions relative to its vegetation management commitments in the electrical corporation’s wildfire mitigation plan. The report shall be made publicly available. The office shall include, if available, the report in its performance review prepared pursuant to paragraph (4).

(6) Each electrical corporation shall reimburse the office for the office’s costs to implement this section with respect to that electrical corporation.

(c) (1) An electrical corporation shall not divert revenues authorized by the commission to implement the approved wildfire mitigation plan to any programs or activities outside of the plan approved pursuant to Section 8386.4. An electrical corporation shall notify the commission by advice letter of both of the following:

(A) The date when the electrical corporation projects that it will have spent, or incurred obligations to spend, its entire annual revenue requirement for vegetation management in its wildfire mitigation plan not less than 30 days before that date.

(B) A detailed summary of the electrical corporation’s workforce development efforts completed in compliance with the Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) A description of and data on the extent to which
 the electrical corporation advertises job openings to members of California Conservation Corps crews and members of community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(ii) A description of and data on the extent to which the electrical corporation, in seeking to develop potential members of its workforce, has links to or otherwise works with community-based or other organizations that work with current members of California Conservation Corps crews and current members of community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code, and formerly incarcerated conservation crew members.

(iii) A description of the extent to which the electrical corporation supports skill-development efforts that would assist current and former members of California Conservation Corps crews, members of community conservation corps, as
 defined in Section 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code, formerly incarcerated conservation crew members, and others with similar skillsets in acquiring skills needed to complete work on or near electrical facilities. This clause does not alter the requirements imposed on an employer pursuant to Section 12952 of the Government Code.

(2) An electrical corporation shall provide to the office a copy of the advice letter pursuant to paragraph (1) at the same time the advice letter is submitted to the commission.

(d) This section does not impose any liability on the office regarding the performance of its duties.

(e) The commission shall not allow a large electrical corporation to include in its equity rate base its share, as determined pursuant to the Wildfire Fund
 allocation metric specified in Section 3280, of the first five billion dollars ($5,000,000,000) expended in aggregate by large electrical corporations on fire risk mitigation capital expenditures included in the electrical corporations’ approved wildfire mitigation plans. An electrical corporation’s share of the fire risk mitigation capital expenditures and the debt financing costs of these fire risk mitigation capital expenditures may be financed through a financing order pursuant to Section 850.1 subject to the requirements of that financing order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 56.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.4.

(a) (1) The commission shall consider the cost of implementing each electrical corporation’s plan in its general rate case proceeding and shall approve the costs for wildfire risk mitigation programs and activities it determines are just and reasonable.

(2) In the commission’s discretion, each electrical corporation may establish a memorandum account to track costs incurred for wildfire risk mitigation that are unforeseen and incremental to the wildfire risk mitigation programs and activities authorized in the electrical corporation’s revenue requirements. The commission shall review the costs in the memorandum accounts and disallow recovery of those costs the commission deems unreasonable.

(3) The chief executive officer of an electrical corporation shall certify in each general rate case application that the electrical corporation has not received authorization from the commission to recover the costs in a previous proceeding, including wildfire cost recovery applications.

(b) For a general rate case application filed after January 1, 2027, all of the following apply:

(1) The electrical corporation shall file its preliminary wildfire mitigation plan approved pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8386.3, or, if no plan has been approved by the office, the wildfire mitigation plan filed pursuant to subdivision (c) of
 Section 8386, and any applicable decision from the office, with the general rate case application and shall include testimony establishing the forecast of costs necessary to implement the programs and activities in the plan.